Hawaii statutes.
§441-30 Form of licenses. The form of
every license shall be prescribed by the director, and shall be issued in the
name of the department, and signed by the director. [L 1967, c 199, pt of §1;
HRS §441-30; am L 1975, c 21, §14; am L 1981, c 221, §16]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next